Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

General Rights of All Service Recipients

33-3-101. Rights of persons under this title equal to those of other persons except as limited by this title — Records.

No person shall be deprived of liberty on the grounds that the person has or is believed to have a mental illness, a serious emotional disturbance, a developmental disability, or is in need of service for such a condition except in accordance with this title.

A person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability has the same rights as all other persons except to the extent that the person's rights are curtailed in accordance with this title or other law.

A person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability shall be provided services or supports, to the extent that facilities, equipment and personnel are available, in accordance with community standards.

The chief officer shall keep records detailing services or supports received by each person. Records shall be preserved by the chief officer for not less than ten (10) years after termination of service. The records may be generated, maintained, or transferred in whole or in part to any recording medium that assures accurate preservation of the record. If a record is transferred from one medium to another, the source record may be destroyed upon determination by the chief officer that the reproduced record is true and correct and will be accurately preserved. The reproduced record is deemed to be the original record.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-4-102; Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Former § 33-4-102 was transferred and designated as subsection (c) of this section in 2002. See the Compiler's Notes under former § 33-4-102 for the history of subsection (c) prior to its transfer.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Collateral References.

Liability for malicious prosecution predicated upon institution of, or conduct in connection with, insanity proceedings. 30 A.L.R.3d 455.

33-3-102. Specific rights protected.

No person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability hospitalized or admitted, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, or ordered to participate in nonresidential treatment or service under this title, shall, solely by reason of the hospitalization, admission, or order, be denied the right to dispose of property, execute instruments, make purchases, enter into contractual relationships, give informed consent to treatment, and vote, unless;

The service recipient has been adjudicated incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and has not been restored to legal capacity; or

The denial is authorized by state or federal statute.

No person shall make decisions for a service recipient on the basis of a claim to be the service recipient's conservator, legal guardian, guardian ad litem, caregiver under title 34, chapter 6, part 3, or to be acting under a durable power of attorney for health care under title 34, chapter 6, part 2, until the person has presented written evidence of the person's status.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 9; 2004, ch. 565, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The former last undesignated paragraph of (a) which read: “If the chief officer of a facility in which a service recipient is hospitalized or admitted is of the opinion that the service recipient is unable to exercise any of the aforementioned rights, the chief officer shall notify immediately the service recipient and the service recipient's attorney, parent, legal custodian, spouse or other nearest known adult relative of the fact, and the chief officer may file for the appointment of a conservator and shall notify those persons as to whether the chief officer intends to do so.” was transferred to § 33-4-110 in 2002.

Cross-References. Informing patients of rights, § 33-4-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Civil Commitment in Tennessee — What Process is Due? (W. Russell Stambaugh), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 135 (1978).

33-3-103. Confidentiality of mental health records.

All applications, certificates, records, reports, legal documents, and pleadings made and all information provided or received in connection with services applied for, provided under, or regulated under this title and directly or indirectly identifying a service recipient or former service recipient shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except in compliance with this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Retention of patient's or resident's records, OAG 97-126, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159 (9/02/97).

33-3-104. Persons who may consent to disclosure of confidential information.

Information about a service recipient that is confidential under § 33-3-103 may be disclosed with the consent of:

The service recipient who is sixteen (16) years of age or over;

The conservator of the service recipient;

The attorney in fact under a power of attorney who has the right to make disclosures under the power;

The parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of a service recipient who is a child;

The service recipient's guardian ad litem for the purposes of the litigation in which the guardian ad litem serves;

The treatment review committee for a service recipient who has been involuntarily committed;

The executor, administrator or personal representative on behalf of a deceased service recipient;

The caregiver under title 34, chapter 6, part 3; or

An individual acting as an agent under the Tennessee Health Care Decisions Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 11, part 18 or a person's surrogate as designated under title 68, chapter 11, part 18.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2004, ch. 565, § 3; 2013, ch. 238, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 12.

Attorney General Opinions. A group home is prohibited from releasing information that directly or indirectly identifies a patient or resident or former patient or resident, except under certain limited circumstances, OAG 00-076, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (4/25/00).

33-3-105. Disclosure of confidential information without consent.

Information that is confidential under § 33-3-103 may be disclosed without consent of the service recipient if:

Disclosure is necessary to carry out duties under this title;

Disclosure may be necessary to assure service or care to the service recipient by the least drastic means that are suitable to the service recipient's liberty and interests;

As a court orders, after a hearing, upon its determination that disclosure is necessary for the conduct of proceedings before it and that failure to make the disclosure would be contrary to public interest or to the detriment of a party to the proceedings;

It is solely information as to a residential service recipient's overall medical condition without clinical details and is sought by the service recipient's family members, relatives, conservator, legal guardian, legal custodian, guardian ad litem, foster parents, or friends;

A service recipient moves from one service provider to another and exchange of information is necessary for continuity of service;

A custodial agent for another state agency that has legal custody of the service recipient cannot perform the agent's duties properly without the information; or

Necessary for the preparation of a post-mortem examination report in accordance with § 38-7-110(e) and authorized to be obtained pursuant to § 38-7-117(b).

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 10; 2016, ch. 672, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 672, § 2. March 29, 2016.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Obtaining a parent’s mental-health information in child-custody cases. OAG 14-55, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 57 (5/14/14)

33-3-106. Disclosure to advocacy agency — Disclosure to organization paying for treatment — Limitations.

If the head of the federally mandated protection and advocacy agency for persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability, or the designated representative of the agency head, requests disclosure of information protected by § 33-3-103 and specifies the personally identifiable service recipient information sought and the federally mandated function for which it is required, the information may be disclosed to the agency without consent. The disclosure of information shall be made solely for use in connection with the federally mandated function. The disclosures are subject to federal confidentiality laws, including the requirement that there be no further disclosure of the personally identifiable information by the agency without consent of the service recipient or conservator or of the parent's or legal guardian's consent in the case of a child. The service provider shall notify the service recipient, a child service recipient's parent or legal guardian, and the service recipient's conservator, if any, of the disclosure. All public and private service providers shall cooperate with the agency in responding to requests, including, but not limited to, those made under the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 1975 (42 U.S.C. § 6000 et seq.); the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals (PAMII) Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. § 10801 et seq.); and the Protection and Advocacy for Individual Rights Act (29 U.S.C. § 794e).

If an organization may pay for a service provider's service to a service recipient, the service provider may disclose to the organization without service recipient consent only such information about the service recipient as is reasonably necessary to obtain timely payment. Disclosures are on the condition that there be no further disclosure of the personally identifiable information by the agency without service recipient consent.

If the department determines that an emergency substantially impairs a provider's capacity to provide service to its service recipients and the department appoints a receiver for service recipient information, the service recipient's information may be transferred to a new service provider without service recipient consent.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. The Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 1975, 42 U.S.C. § 6000 et seq., has been replaced by the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, compiled as 42 U.S.C. § 15001 et seq.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-107. Rules relating to disclosure of confidential information.

The department may adopt rules to implement § 33-3-103 — 33-3-114, including rules on the form, content, and means of consent and disclosure, scope of permissible disclosure, and definitions of terms.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-108. Access permitted for reports of harm and granting of access in cases of abuse.

Section 33-3-103 does not preclude making reports of harm or granting access to records if making reports of harm or granting access to records is expressly required by:

The Child Abuse Reporting Law, compiled in title 37, chapter 1, part 4;

The Child Sexual Abuse Reporting Law, compiled in title 37, chapter 1, part 6; or

The Adult Protective Services Law, compiled in title 71, chapter 6.

The identity of a person who reports abuse, exploitation, fraud, neglect, misappropriation or mistreatment to the department is confidential and may not be disclosed without the person's consent, except as follows:

As necessary to carry out the laws cited in subsection (a);

To employees of the department as necessary to investigate the report;

To the abuse registry;

To the appropriate district attorney general;

By order of a court with jurisdiction over abuse, exploitation, fraud, neglect, misappropriation or mistreatment; or

By order of a court or administrative law judge in a proceeding involving sanctions or disciplinary actions against a caregiver or an entity accused of abuse, exploitation, fraud, neglect, misappropriation or mistreatment, when it appears to such court or administrative law judge that the person making the report is or may be a witness to facts relevant to the proceeding.

The person's identity is irrelevant to any civil proceeding and is not subject to disclosure, except in cases where a caregiver or other person is the subject of a complaint and can make a showing that the complaint was made with malice so that the caregiver or other person may pursue such remedies as may be permitted by law. The person may be subpoenaed if the department or district attorney general deems it necessary to protect the service recipient who is the subject of the report, but the fact that the person made the report may not be disclosed.

T.C.A. § 33-3-104(10)(B); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 12; 2011, ch. 158, § 16.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-109. Release of information to family members and other designated persons — Acceptance of information from family members of service recipients.

A service recipient for services under chapter 6 of this title shall be given an opportunity to approve and sign an information release that authorizes the facility or program to release certain information concerning the recipient to certain family members and other designated persons. This opportunity shall be offered when the recipient is entering inpatient or outpatient treatment at a facility, admitted in an emergency room, entering in a crisis response setting, or admitted in ongoing treatment with a community mental health care provider. This opportunity shall be offered to the recipient at the time of admission, periodically during treatment, and at discharge.

The service recipient may withdraw authority to release all information previously authorized, withdraw authority to release the information to any individuals previously authorized or modify either the type of information authorized in subsection (c) or the individuals to whom the information may be provided. All such changes must be executed in writing by the service recipient or:

The conservator of the service recipient;

The attorney in fact under a power of attorney who has the right to make disclosures under the power;

The parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of a service recipient who is a child;

The service recipient's guardian ad litem for the purposes of the litigation in which the guardian ad litem serves;

The treatment review committee for a service recipient who has been involuntarily committed;

The executor, administrator or personal representative on behalf of a deceased service recipient; or

The caregiver under title 34, chapter 6, part 3.

The information release shall provide the service recipient options for authorized disclosures to:

Specified family members that discloses only location;

Specified family members who are to be involved with discharge instructions and linking to other services; and

Specified family who are to be involved in and supportive in the treatment process.

The department shall encourage education of mental health care providers regarding accepting information from family members in the course of the treatment process.

Acts 2007, ch. 356, § 1; 2008, ch. 789, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-3-109 (Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1), concerning adjudications of competence not confidential records that must be kept separate, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 9.

Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 13, purported to amend § 33-3-109; however, that section was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-110. Disclosure to law enforcement agencies in cases of felony acts of bodily harm or sexual abuse.

Section 33-3-103 does not prohibit disclosure to a law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over felonious acts of bodily harm or sexual offenses that appear to have been committed on the premises of a facility whose records are made confidential by § 33-3-103.

If the felonious act involves a sexual offense governed by title 37, chapter 1, part 6, and title 71, chapter 6, part 1, in a locality having a sex abuse crime unit, disclosure for law enforcement investigative purposes shall be made only to that unit of the law enforcement agency. This section does not limit the requirements of disclosure of reports of harm and access to records required by title 37, chapter 1, parts 4 and 6, and title 71, chapter 6, part 1, for investigations by the department of human services.

Permissible disclosure of a felonious act for the purpose of conducting a necessary investigation includes:

The name of, and providing access to, witnesses or potential witnesses of the offense;

The name of, and providing access to, suspects or potential suspects of the offense; and

The scene of, and providing access to, where the offense occurred.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-111. Records of child service recipient not available to person accused of abusing recipient — Exceptions and limitations.

In any case where a person is known to have been accused of physically or sexually abusing or neglecting a service recipient who is a child, the service recipient's record shall not be accessible to the person accused of the abuse or neglect, except if:

A court orders access under § 33-3-105(3); or

The child's qualified mental health professional has determined in the course of the treatment or service, after consultation with the child, the child's guardian ad litem, and others on the child's behalf whom the professional deems appropriate, that the release of the child's record to the accused person would not be harmful to the child; and

The accused person is the parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of the child.

If the court permits access to the child's record under subsection (a), the court shall have jurisdiction to issue any necessary orders to control access to and use of the information by the person seeking access, including the issuance of injunctive relief.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-112. Disclosure to service recipient of records kept and procedures for accessing records.

Upon request by a service recipient sixteen (16) years of age or older, a service provider shall disclose to the service recipient what records the provider maintains on the service recipient and how the service recipient can obtain access to them. Upon written request by a service recipient, a service provider shall permit the service recipient, within a reasonable time, to review the service recipient's record itself or the part of it that the service recipient requests or a copy of the record or the part except to the extent that:

Service recipient access to the record is expressly restricted or prohibited by another statute; or

The provider is authorized to deny access under subsection (b).

If a person's qualified mental health professional determines that giving the service recipient, or a person acting for the service recipient, access to part of the service recipient's record poses a substantial risk of serious harm to the health or safety of the service recipient or another person, then the qualified mental health professional may refuse access to that part of the record.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-113. Request by recipient to have record amended.

If a service recipient requests amendment of the service recipient's record by revision, deletion, or addition to correct the record, the service provider shall, within ten (10) working days after receiving the request, either make the amendment to assure that service recipient's records do not contain inaccurate, irrelevant, or otherwise inappropriate information or inform the service recipient of its refusal, of the reason for the refusal, and of the procedure, if any, for further internal review of the decision.

If any provider decides that it will not amend the record in accordance with the request, it shall permit the service recipient to file a concise statement of the reasons for the service recipient's disagreement.

If any provider discloses any of the disputed information, it shall clearly note the disputed information and provide a copy of the statement of disagreement. If the provider wishes, it may also provide a concise statement of its reasons for not making the requested amendments.

The service recipient may not personally alter the record.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-114. Exceptions to evidentiary privilege of mental health professionals.

Notwithstanding any evidentiary privilege a qualified mental health professional may have, including §§ 24-1-207, 63-11-213, 63-22-114, and 63-23-109, the qualified mental health professional may be compelled to testify in:

Judicial proceedings under this title to commit a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability to treatment if the qualified mental health professional decides that the service recipient is in need of compulsory care and treatment;

In proceedings for which the qualified mental health professional was ordered by the court to examine the service recipient if the service recipient was advised that communications to the qualified mental health professional would not be privileged;

Judicial proceedings under chapter 8, part 3 of this title; and

Guardianship, conservatorship, and veterans' guardianship proceedings under title 34.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 14.

Cross-References. Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Law, title 34, ch. 5.

Collateral References.

Waiver of evidentiary privilege by inadvertent disclosure — State law. 51 A.L.R.5th 603.

33-3-115.
Information to be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS index and the department of safety by any clerk of court that maintains records of an adjudication as a mental defective or a judicial commitment to a mental institution.

Any clerk of court that maintains records of an adjudication as a mental defective or a judicial commitment to a mental institution pursuant to chapter 6 or chapter 7 shall, in accordance with the procedures outlined in title 16, disclose the following information set out in subsection (b) solely for the purposes of complying with §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1351, 39-17-1352, 16-1-117(a)(6) and the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, Public Law 110-180.

The following information shall be collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index, and the department of safety, pursuant to this subsection (b):

Complete name and all aliases of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, including, but not limited to, any names that the individual may have had or currently has by reason of marriage or otherwise;

Case or docket number of the judicial commitment or the adjudication as a mental defective;

Date judicial commitment ordered or adjudication as a mental defective was made;

Private or state hospital or treatment resource to which the individual was judicially committed;

Date of birth of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective, if such information has been provided to the clerk;

Race and sex of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective; and

Social security number of the individual judicially committed or adjudicated as a mental defective if available.

The information in subdivisions (b)(1) – (7), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceeding pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 — 39-17-1354.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Judicial commitment to a mental institution” means a judicially ordered involuntary admission to a private or state hospital or treatment resource in proceedings conducted pursuant to title 33, chapter 6 or title 33, chapter 7;

“Adjudication as a mental defective or adjudicated as a mental defective” means:

A determination by a court in this state that a person, as a result of marked subnormal intelligence, mental illness, incompetency, condition or disease:

Is a danger to such person or to others; or

Lacks the ability to contract or manage such person's own affairs due to mental defect;

A finding of insanity by a court in a criminal proceeding; or

A finding that a person is incompetent to stand trial or is found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to 50a and 72b of the Uniform Code of Military Justice (10 U.S.C. §§ 850a, 876b).

Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 5; 2013, ch. 300, § 7; 2019, ch. 262, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. The NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, Public Law 110-180, may be found as a note to 18 USCS § 922.

Former § 33-3-115 (T.C.A. § 33-3-104(10)(B); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1), concerning penalties for violations of §§ 33-3-103—33-3-114, was transferred to § 33-3-116 by Acts 2009, ch. 578, §§ 5 and 6, effective January 1, 2010.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b)(6) and (b)(7); and, in (c), substituted “subdivisions (b)(1) - (7)” for “subdivisions (b)(1) - (5)” and substituted “proceeding pursuant to §§ 38-6-109, 39-17-1316, and 39-17-1352 — 39-17-1354” for “proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 262, § 7. July 1, 2019.

33-3-116. Penalty for violation.

A violation of §§ 33-3-103—33-3-115 is a Class C misdemeanor.

T.C.A. § 33-3-104(10)(B); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; Acts 2009, ch. 578, § 6; T.C.A. § 33-3-115.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-3-115 was transferred to this section by Acts 2009, ch. 578, §§ 5 and 6, effective January 1, 2010.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

33-3-117. Reporting to local law enforcement by inpatient treatment facility of involuntary commitment of service recipient.

If a service recipient is involuntarily committed to an inpatient treatment facility under this title, the inpatient treatment facility shall report the service recipient to local law enforcement as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of such commitment, who shall report the service recipient to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety as soon as practicable, but no later than the third business day following the date of receiving such notification, for the purposes of complying with the NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, Public Law 110-180, as enacted and as may be amended in the future.

If an inpatient treatment facility is required to report pursuant to subsection (a), the facility shall report the following information:

Complete name of the person involuntarily committed;

Date involuntary commitment was ordered;

Private or state hospital or treatment resource to which the individual was involuntarily committed;

Date of birth of the person involuntarily committed;

Race and sex of the person involuntarily committed; and

Social security number of the person involuntarily committed if available.

The information in subdivisions (b)(1)-(4), the confidentiality of which is protected by other statutes or regulations, shall be maintained as confidential and not subject to public inspection pursuant to such statutes or regulations, except for such use as may be necessary in the conduct of any proceedings pursuant to §§ 39-17-1316, 39-17-1353 and 39-17-1354.

Acts 2013, ch. 300, § 8; 2018, ch. 799, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The NICS Improvement Amendments Act of 2007, Public Law 110-180, may be found as a note to 18 USCS § 922.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b)(5) and (6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 799, § 7. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-3-118, 33-3-119.
[Reserved.]

Service recipients have the right to be free from isolation and restraints, in any form, imposed as a means of coercion, discipline, convenience or retaliation by staff. Restraints include physical and mechanical restraints and drugs used to control behavior or to restrict freedom of movement if the drug or the dosage of the drug is not a standard treatment for the service recipient's medical or psychiatric condition. Isolation is placement of a person alone in a room from which egress is prevented. Isolation and restraint may be used only while the condition justifying its use exists.

A person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance may be isolated or restrained only in emergency situations if necessary to assure the physical safety of the person or another person nearby or to prevent significant destruction of property. If a person imposes restraints or isolation, the person shall immediately contact a professional who is permitted under department rules to authorize the isolation or restraint. If the treating physician is not the person who orders isolation or restraint, the treating physician shall be consulted as soon as possible. A professional authorized by department rules shall see and evaluate the person's condition within one (1) hour of the intervention.

A person with developmental disability may be restrained only as part of an approved plan or in emergency situations if necessary to assure the physical safety of the person or another person nearby or to prevent significant destruction of property. Isolation may only be used with a person with developmental disability as part of the person's approved plan. Only psychologists, psychological examiners, senior psychological examiners, physicians, behavior analysts, masters degree social workers, and others authorized to do so under department rules may develop a plan that includes or authorizes isolation or restraint of a person with developmental disability.

Staff shall remain in the physical presence of a person in restraint. Staff shall continuously observe a person in isolation or restraint for the health and well being of the person.

The professional shall record the use of restraint or isolation, the reasons for its use, and the duration of its use in the person's record.

All staff who may have direct contact with a person being restrained or isolated shall receive ongoing education and training in alternative methods for handling behavior and the safe use of isolation and restraint.

The department shall adopt rules as to circumstances under which use of restraint and isolation are permitted. The department shall distribute the rules to all who provide services covered by this title.

The department shall report annually to the statewide planning and policy council on the use of restraint and isolation in the state and its rules on the subject.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 334, § 2; 2002, ch. 730, § 15; 2007, ch. 96, § 1.

33-3-121 — 33-3-124.
[Reserved.]

A certificate of need for commitment for care and treatment as a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability that is authorized or required to be made by a physician, psychologist, or other professional under this title is not valid for any purpose if:

It is made by a professional who is a relative by blood, marriage, or adoption, or the legal guardian, conservator, or legal custodian of the person who is the subject of the petition, application or certificate; or

It is made by a professional who has an ownership interest in a private facility in which the person is to be admitted.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 16; T.C.A., §§ 33-345, 33-3-108; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-126. Right to religious expression.

A licensee or provider under this title may not discourage or preclude a service recipient from exercising the right to religious expression and shall inform each service recipient in a residential environment of this right. A licensee or provider of religious service may provide transportation for a service recipient under this section.

Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 8.